California, session 20252026, AB2700.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 719.3 is added to the Public Utilities Code, immediately following Section 719, to read:719.3. On or before January 1, 2028, the commission shall generate a report assessing the verified restitution shortfalls for victims of wildfires caused by electrical corporations occurring before July 12, 2019, and recommend mechanisms for electrical corporations to address those verified restitution shortfalls to ensure victims are fully and fairly compensated in a timely manner while supporting long-term rate stability. The recommendations shall not include any measures that authorize rate recovery for restitution payments.